District of Columbia statutes.
7-154

Establishment of Public Health Coordination Advisory Committee.

(a)

There is established a Public Health Coordination Advisory Committee (“Committee”) which shall be responsible for advising the Director of the Department of Public Health, the Mayor and the Council on policy matters related to the effective and efficient coordination of the delivery of public health care services in the District of Columbia.

(b)

The Committee shall include:

(1)

The Director of the Department of Public Health who shall serve as the chairperson;

(2)

The Director of the Department of Mental Health or a designee;

(3)

The Commissioner of Social Services or a designee;

(4)

The Executive Director of the District of Columbia General Hospital or a designee;

(5)

The Executive Director of the Office on Aging or a designee;

(6)

The Director of the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs or a designee;

(7)

The President of the Doctors Council of the District of Columbia, representing employees in Compensation Unit 19, or a designee; and

(8)

The following persons who shall be appointed by the Mayor:

(A)

1 licensed physician and 1 licensed dentist employed by a District health care facility;

(B)

2 licensed nurses employed by a District health care facility; and

(C)

2 consumers of health care services in the District.

(c)

The duties of the Committee shall include advising the Director of the Department of Public Health on the development, implementation and monitoring of a comprehensive plan to coordinate the delivery of District health care services provided by the public health clinics of the Department of Public Health and the District of Columbia General Hospital to provide a comprehensive continuum of efficient and quality health care services to District residents.

Mar. 13, 1992, D.C. Law 9-182, § 5, 39 DCR 8203
Dec. 18, 2001, D.C. Law 14-56, § 116(d), 48 DCR 7674
1981 Ed., § 6-134.
D.C. Law 14-56, in subsec. (b)(2), substituted “Director of the Department of Mental Health” for “Commissioner of Mental Health Services”.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 16(d) of Department of Mental Health Establishment Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-51, October 30, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 10807).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 16(d) of Department of Mental Health Establishment Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-55, May 2, 2001, 48 DCR 4390).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 16(d) of Department of Mental Health Establishment Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-101, July 23, 2001, 48 DCR 7123).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 116(d) of Mental Health Service Delivery Reform Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-144, October 23, 2001, 48 DCR 9947).